Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 10. GENERAL GOVERNMENT

SUBTITLE B. INFORMATION AND PLANNING

CHAPTER 2053. REPORT BY GOVERNOR ON ORGANIZATION AND EFFICIENCY OF STATE AGENCIES

Sec. 2053.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "State agency" means a board, commission, department, office, or other agency, except a university system or institution of higher education as defined by Section 61.003, Education Code, that:

(A) is in the executive branch of state government;

(B) has statewide authority; and

(C) is created by the constitution or by statute.

(2) "Functional area" means one of the following areas of concern to state government:

(A) natural resources;

(B) health and human resources;

(C) education;

(D) economic development and transportation;

(E) agriculture;

(F) public protection;

(G) consumer protection;

(H) work force; or

(I) any other area in which the governor appoints an interagency planning council under Section 772.003.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 2053.002. REPORT. (a) Before the end of each even-numbered year, the governor shall prepare and submit to the legislature a report on the organization and efficiency of state agencies.

(b) The report must group state agencies into functional areas and must include the following items about the state agencies in each functional area:

(1) information about the efficiency with which the agencies operate;

(2) recommendations about the reorganization of the agencies and the consolidation, transfer, or abolition of their functions; and

(3) any other information about the organization or efficiency of the agencies that the governor considers necessary.

(c) The Legislative Budget Board shall coordinate the collection of information to be included in the report.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 2053.003. PARTICIPATION BY INTERAGENCY PLANNING COUNCILS. (a) In preparing the report required by this chapter, the governor shall request and consider from each interagency planning council appointed under Section 772.003 information about the efficiency of the state agencies in the council's functional area and recommendations about the reorganization of those agencies.

(b) Before submitting the report to the legislature, the governor shall submit to each interagency planning council for review and comment the part of the proposed report about the state agencies in the council's functional area.

(c) The governor shall submit with the report the comments received under Subsection (b).

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 2053.004. LEGISLATION. The Texas Legislative Council shall draft any legislation required to implement the recommendations contained in the report required by this chapter.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.